District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-206

Offer and acceptance in formation of lease contract.

(a)

Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or circumstances, an offer to make a lease contract must be construed as inviting acceptance in any manner and by any medium reasonable in the circumstances.

(b)

If the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable mode of acceptance, an offeror who is not notified of acceptance within a reasonable time may treat the offer as having lapsed before acceptance.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

History

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-206.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-206(1)(a) and (2).

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Notifies”. Section 1-201(26).

“Reasonable time”. Section 1-204(1) and (2).